Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 258. MARION COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER B. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO HUNTING

Sec. 258.011. SHOOTING PISTOLS ON CADDO LAKE. (a) No person may shoot a pistol in, on, along, or across Caddo Lake in Marion County.

(b) This section does not apply to peace officers or employees of the department engaged in official duties, nor does this section prohibit hunting with a shotgun during an open season.

(c) Peace officers and authorized employees of the department may inspect boats and other watercraft for violations of this section without a warrant.

(d) A prosecution for a violation of this section may be maintained in Marion or Harrison County without regard to where the offense occurred.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.